Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2071.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 13B52(d)(3) of Title 4 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the subsection is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 13B52. Interactive gaming tax.* * *(d) Deposit of funds.--From the tax imposed under subsections (a) and (c), the following shall apply:* * *(3) [Twenty-five] Twenty-two percent shall be deposited into a restricted receipts account to be established in the Commonwealth Financing Authority to be used exclusively for grants for projects in the public interest in the 1234567891011121314151617 Commonwealth.(4) Three percent shall be deposited into the Race Horse Development Trust Fund established under section 1405 (relating to Pennsylvania Race Horse Development Trust Fund) for the exclusive use of an active and operating Category 1 licensee conducting live racing under section 1406(a)(1) (relating to distributions from Pennsylvania Race Horse Development Trust Fund).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2071PN2654 - 2 - 123456789